Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0564.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8715. (1) In addition to the fees provided for in part 83, a registrant shall pay an annual water quality protection fee for each product to be that is registered. The water quality protection fee is $270.00 per product. The water quality protection fee is due in the office of the director before July 1. The water quality protection fee is as follows for each product that is registered: (a) For the calendar year 2026, $324.00. (b) For the calendar year 2027, $338.00. (c) For the calendar year 2028, $351.00. (d) For the calendar year 2029, $359.00. (e) For the calendar year 2030 and each calendar year thereafter, $367.00. (2) A registrant shall pay an additional late fee of $100.00 for each pesticide if the pesticide registration is a renewal registration and the water quality protection fee is received by the department after June 30. (3) A person required to pay a specialty fertilizer or soil conditioner registration fee under section 8505 shall pay an additional $100.00 the following water quality protection fee for each brand and product name of each grade registered:. (a) For the calendar year 2026, $120.00. (b) For the calendar year 2027, $125.00. (c) For the calendar year 2028, $130.00. (d) For the calendar year 2029, $133.00. (e) For the calendar year 2030 and each calendar year thereafter, $136.00. (4) All fertilizer manufacturers or distributors licensed under part 85, except specialty fertilizer and soil conditioner registrants, shall pay the following water quality protection fee per pound of fertilizer sold: (a) Until December 31, 2015, a water quality protection fee of 1-1/2 cents per percent of nitrogen in the fertilizer for each ton of fertilizer sold. (a) (b) Beginning January 1, 2016, $.0005 per pound of fertilizer sold.For the calendar year 2026, $0.0006. (b) For the calendar year 2027, $0.000625. (c) For the calendar year 2028, $0.00065. (d) For the calendar year 2029, $0.000665. (e) For the calendar year 2030 and each calendar year thereafter, $0.00068. (5) The fees collected under this part, including any interest or dividends earned, must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money received to the fund. (6) Upon On the expenditure or appropriation of money raised in this section for any purpose other than those specifically listed in this part, authorization to collect fees in this section must be suspended until the money expended or appropriated for purposes other than those listed in this part are returned to the fund. (7) The department may audit, or may contract for audits of records that are the basis for fees levied under this section. (8) This section is repealed December 31, 2025.Beginning January 1, 2031, and by each January 1 thereafter, the department may adjust the fees described in this section by an amount determined by multiplying the fee in effect during the immediately preceding fiscal year by the inflation adjustment factor. The inflation adjustment factor described under this subsection is equal to the 3-year average July-June Detroit Consumer Price Index for the current fiscal year divided by the 3-year average July-June Detroit Consumer Price Index for the immediately preceding fiscal year, as determined by the department of treasury. As used in this subsection, "Detroit Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.